District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.04

Simultaneous proceedings.

(a)

A tribunal of the District may exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition or comparable pleading is filed after a pleading is filed in another state or a foreign country only if:

(1)

The petition or comparable pleading in the District is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in the other state or the foreign country for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by the other state or the foreign country;

(2)

The contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in the other state or the foreign country; and

(3)

If relevant, the District is the home state of the child.

(b)

A tribunal of the District may not exercise jurisdiction to establish a support order if the petition or comparable pleading is filed before a petition or comparable pleading is filed in another state or a foreign country if:

(1)

The petition or comparable pleading in the other state or foreign country is filed before the expiration of the time allowed in the District for filing a responsive pleading challenging the exercise of jurisdiction by the District;

(2)

The contesting party timely challenges the exercise of jurisdiction in the District; and

(3)

If relevant, the other state or foreign country is the home state of the child.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 204, 63 DCR 222